Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Orders for Withholding

§ 93-11-101.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119, the following words shall have the meaning ascribed to them herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Order for support” means any order of the chancery, circuit, county or family court, which provides for periodic payment of funds for the support of a child, whether temporary or final, and includes any such order which provides for:

Modification or resumption of, or payment of arrearage accrued under, a previously existing order; or

Reimbursement of support.

“Order for support” shall also mean:

An order for support and maintenance of a spouse if a minor child is living with such spouse; or

In actions to which the Department of Human Services is a party, an order for support and maintenance of a spouse if a minor child is living with such spouse and such maintenance is collected in conjunction with child support.

“Court” means the court that enters an order for withholding pursuant to Section 93-11-103(1).

“Clerk of the court” means the clerk of the court that enters an order for withholding pursuant to Section 93-11-103(1).

“Arrearage” means the total amount of unpaid support obligations.

“Delinquency” means any payments that are ordered by any court to be paid by a noncustodial parent for the support of a child that have remained unpaid for at least thirty (30) days after payment is due. Delinquency shall also include payments that are ordered by any court to be paid for maintenance of a spouse in cases in which the department is collecting such support in conjunction with child support. “Delinquency” shall be synonymous with “overdue support.”

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Human Services.

“Employer” means a person who has control of the payment of income to an individual.

“Income” means any form of periodic payment to an individual, regardless of source, including, but not limited to: wages, salary, commission, compensation as an independent contractor, workers’ compensation, disability, annuity and retirement benefits, and any other payments made by any person, private entity, federal or state government or any unit of local government, notwithstanding any other provisions of state or local law which limit or exempt income or the amount or percentage of income that can be withheld; provided, however, that income excludes:

Any amounts required by law to be withheld, other than creditor claims, including, but not limited to, federal, state and local taxes, social security and other retirement and disability contributions;

Any amounts exempted by federal law;

Public assistance payments; and

Unemployment insurance benefits except as provided by law.

“Obligor” means the individual who owes a duty to make payments under an order for support.

“Obligee” means:

An individual to whom a duty of support is or is alleged to be owed or in whose favor a support order has been issued or a judgment determining parentage has been rendered;

A state or political subdivision to which the rights under a duty of support or support order have been assigned or which independent claims based on financial assistance provided to an individual obligee; or

An individual seeking a judgment determining parentage of the individual’s child.

“Payor” means any payor of income to an obligor.

“Lump-sum payment” means any form of income paid to an individual at other than regular intervals or a payment made upon a particular occasion regardless of frequency that is dependent upon meeting a condition precedent, including, but not limited to, the performance of a contract, commission paid outside of and in addition to a person’s regular pay cycle, the satisfaction of a job performance standard or quota, the receipt of a seasonal or occasional bonus or incentive payment, the liquidation of unused sick or vacation pay or leave, the settlement of a claim, an amount paid as severance pay, or an award for length of service. “Lump-sum payment” shall not include liens under Section 71-3-129.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 11; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 5; Laws, 2009, ch. 564, § 7; Laws, 2010, ch. 465, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch. 530, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 93-11-103.
Entry of order for withholding; content; copies; duration; withholding from lump-sum payment made by employer to employee who owes child support arrearage.

Upon entry of any order for support by a court of this state where the custodial parent is a recipient of services under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, issued on or after October 1, 1996, the court entering such order shall enter a separate order for withholding which shall take effect immediately without any requirement that the obligor be delinquent in payment. All such orders for support issued prior to October 1, 1996, shall, by operation of law, be amended to conform with the provisions contained herein. All such orders for support issued shall:

Contain a provision for monthly income withholding procedures to take effect in the event the obligor becomes delinquent in paying the order for support without further amendment to the order or further action by the court; and

Require that the payor withhold any additional amount for delinquency specified in any order if accompanied by an affidavit of accounting, a notarized record of overdue payments, official payment record or an attested judgment for delinquency or contempt. Any person who willfully and knowingly files a false affidavit, record or judgment shall be subject to a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). The Department of Human Services shall be the designated agency to receive payments made by income withholding in child support orders enforced by the department. All withholding orders shall be on a form as prescribed by the department.

Upon entry of any order for support by a court of this state where the custodial parent is not a recipient of services under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, issued or modified or found to be in arrears on or after January 1, 1994, the court entering such order shall enter a separate order for withholding which shall take effect immediately. Such orders shall not be subject to immediate income withholding under this subsection: (a) if one (1) of the parties (i.e., noncustodial or custodial parent) demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding, or (b) if both parties agree in writing to an alternative arrangement. The Department of Human Services shall be the designated agency to receive payments made by income withholding in all child support orders. Withholding orders shall be on a form as prescribed by the department.

If a child support order is issued or modified in the state but is not subject to immediate income withholding, it automatically becomes so if the court finds that a support payment is thirty (30) days past due. If the support order was issued or modified in another state but is not subject to immediate income withholding, it becomes subject to immediate income withholding on the date on which child support payments are at least thirty (30) days in arrears, or (a) the date as of which the noncustodial parent requests that withholding begin, (b) the date as of which the custodial parent requests that withholding begin, or (c) an earlier date chosen by the court, whichever is earlier.

The clerk of the court shall submit copies of such orders to the obligor’s payor, any additional or subsequent payor, and to the Mississippi Department of Human Services Case Registry. The clerk of the court, the obligee’s attorney, or the department may serve such immediate order for withholding by first-class mail or personal delivery on the obligor’s payor, superintendent, manager, agent or subsequent payor, as the case may be. There shall be no need for further notice, hearing, order, process or procedure before service of said order on the payor or any additional or subsequent payor. The obligor may contest, if grounds exist, service of the order of withholding on additional or subsequent payors, by filing an action with the issuing court. Such filing shall not stay the obligor’s duty to support pending judicial determination of the obligor’s claim. Nothing herein shall be construed to restrict the authority of the courts of this state from entering any order it deems appropriate to protect the rights of any parties involved.

The order for withholding shall:

Direct any payor to withhold an amount equal to the order for current support;

Direct any payor to withhold an additional amount, not less than fifteen percent (15%) of the order for support, until payment in full of any delinquency; and

Direct the payor not to withhold in excess of the amounts allowed under Section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, being 15 USCS 1673, as amended.

All orders for withholding may permit the Department of Human Services to withhold through said withholding order additional amounts to recover costs incurred through its efforts to secure the support order, including, but not limited to, all filing fees, court costs, service of process fees, mailing costs, birth certificate certification fee, genetic testing fees, the department’s attorney’s fees; and, in cases where the state or any of its entities or divisions have provided medical services to the child or the child’s mother, all medical costs of prenatal care, birthing, postnatal care and any other medical expenses incurred by the child or by the mother as a consequence of her pregnancy or delivery.

At the time the order for withholding is entered, the clerk of the court shall provide copies of the order for withholding and the order for support to the obligor, which shall be accompanied by a statement of the rights, remedies and duties of the obligor under Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119. The clerk of the court shall make copies available to the obligee and to the department or its local attorney.

The order for withholding shall remain in effect for as long as the order for support upon which it is based.

The failure of an order for withholding to state an arrearage is not conclusive of the issue of whether an arrearage is owing.

Any order for withholding entered pursuant to this section shall not be considered a garnishment.

All existing orders for support shall become subject to additional withholding if arrearages occur, subject to court hearing and order. The Department of Human Services or the obligee or his agent or attorney must send to each delinquent obligor notice that:

The withholding on the delinquency has commenced;

The information along with the required affidavit of accounting, notarized record of overdue payment or attested judgment of delinquency or contempt has been sent to the employer; and

The obligor may file an action with the issuing court on the grounds of mistake of fact. Such filing must be made within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notice and shall not stay the obligor’s duty to support pending judicial determination of the obligor’s claim.

An employer who complies with an income withholding notice that is regular on its face and which is accompanied by the required accounting affidavit, notarized record of overdue payments or attested judgment of delinquency or contempt shall not be subject to civil liability to any individual or agency for conduct in compliance with the notice.

Any employer who has been served with an order for withholding under this section, which includes a provision for payment of arrears, shall notify the Department of Human Services before making any lump-sum payment of more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to the obligor.

An employer to whom this section applies shall notify the Department of Human Services of its intention to make a lump-sum payment at least forty-five (45) days before the planned date of the lump-sum payment, or as soon as the decision is made to make the payment, should that be less than forty-five (45) days. The employer shall not release the lump sum to the obligor until thirty (30) days after the intended date of the payment or until authorization is received from the Department of Human Services, whichever is earlier.

Upon receipt of notice to pay a lump sum from an employer, the Department of Human Services shall provide the employer with a Notice of Lien in accordance with Section 93-11-71 specifying the amount of the lump sum to be withheld for payment of child support arrearage. Unless the lump sum is considered severance pay, any amount of the lump sum up to the entire arrearage may be withheld. If the lump sum is for severance pay, the amount withheld for child support arrearages may not exceed an amount equal to the amount the employer would have withheld if the severance pay had been paid as the employee’s usual earnings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 474, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 543, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 374, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 435, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 6; Laws, 1999, ch. 512, § 18; Laws, 2000, ch. 530, § 7; Laws, 2003, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 564, § 8; Laws, 2010, ch. 465, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 530, § 4; Laws, 2013, ch. 354, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 93-11-105.
Administrative orders.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 93-11-103, the Department of Human Services shall be authorized to implement administrative orders for withholding without the necessity of obtaining an order through judicial proceedings. The administrative order for withholding shall be implemented pursuant to a previously rendered order for support and shall be on a form prescribed by the Department of Human Services. Unless inconsistent with the provisions of this section, the order for withholding shall be subject to the same requirements as provided in Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-118.

A copy of the administrative order shall be transmitted to the obligor by regular mail to the last-known address of the obligor.

The order for withholding shall:

Direct any payor to withhold an amount equal to the order for the current support obligation;

Direct any payor to withhold an additional amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of the current support obligation, unless a different amount has been previously ordered by the court, until payment in full of any delinquency; and

Direct the payor not to withhold in excess of the amounts allowed under Section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, being 15 USCS 1673, as amended.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 512, § 17; Laws, 2000, ch. 530, § 8; Laws, 2013, ch. 354, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§§ 93-11-107 and 93-11-109.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 588, §§ 8 and 9, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§93-11-107. [Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 4]

§93-11-109. [Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 5; Laws 1992, ch. 527, § 1]

§ 93-11-111.
Duties of payor; payments to obligee; fees.

It shall be the duty of any payor who has been served with a copy of the order for withholding and an attached affidavit of accounting, a certified record of payments, or judgment for delinquency to deduct and pay over income as provided in this section. The payor shall deduct the amount designated in the order for withholding beginning with the next payment of income that is payable to the obligor after fourteen (14) days following service of the order and notice. The payor shall pay the amounts withheld to the department within seven (7) days of the date the obligor is paid in accordance with the order for withholding and in accordance with any later notification received redirecting payments. The department shall then forward those amounts to the obligee.

For each intrastate withholding of income, the payor shall be entitled to receive a fee of Two Dollars ($2.00) to be withheld from the income of the obligor in addition to the support payments, regardless of the number of payments the payor makes to the department. However, in all interstate withholding, the rules and laws of the state where the obligor works shall determine the payor’s processing fee.

The payor shall, unless otherwise notified by the department, withhold from the income of the obligor and forward to the department each month, an amount specified by the department not to exceed Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) per month to defray the department’s administrative costs incurred in receiving and distributing money withheld under Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119. The payor may pay such amount to the department in any manner determined by the payor to be convenient and may include that amount in checks to the department for amounts withheld pursuant to the order for withholding.

Regardless of the amount designated in the order for withholding and regardless of other fees imposed or amounts withheld under this section, the payor shall not deduct from the income of the obligor in excess of the amounts allowed under Section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, being 15 USCS 1673, as amended.

A payor may combine all amounts that he is required to withhold and pay to the department in one (1) payment; however, the payor must send to the department a list showing the amount of the payment attributable to each obligor.

Whenever the obligor is no longer receiving income from the payor, the payor shall return a copy of the order for withholding to the department and shall forward the obligor’s last known address and name and address of the obligor’s new employer, if known, to the department. The payor shall cooperate in providing further information for the purpose of enforcing Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119.

Withholding of income under this section shall be made without regard to any prior or subsequent garnishments, attachments, wage assignments or any other claims of creditors. Payment as required by the order for withholding shall be a complete defense by the payor against any claims of the obligor or his creditors as to the sum so paid.

In cases in which the payor has been served more than one (1) order for withholding for the same obligor, the payor shall honor the orders on a pro rata basis to result in withholding an amount for each order that is in direct proportion to the percentage of the obligor’s adjusted gross income that the order represents, and the payor shall honor all those withholdings to the extent that the total amount withheld does not exceed the maximum amount specified in subsection (1) of this section.

No payor shall discharge, discipline, refuse to hire or otherwise penalize any obligor because of the duty to withhold income.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 6; Laws, 1986, ch. 474, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 543, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 10; Laws, 2004, ch. 597, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 378, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 424, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 93-11-113.
Modification, suspension, or termination of orders.

At any time, an obligor, obligee, the department or clerk of the court may petition the court to:

Modify, suspend or terminate the order for withholding because of a modification, suspension or termination of the underlying order for support; or

Modify the amount of income to be withheld to reflect payment in full of the delinquency by income withholding or otherwise; or

Suspend the order for withholding because of inability to deliver income withheld to the obligee due to the obligee’s failure to provide a mailing address or other means of delivery.

The clerk shall serve on the payor, by first class mail or personal delivery, a copy of any order entered pursuant to this section that affects the duties of the payor.

The order for withholding shall continue to be binding upon the payor until service of any order of the court entered under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 7; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 93-11-115.
Additional notice requirements; records, legal forms, and information.

An obligee who is receiving income withholding payments under Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119 shall notify the department of any change of address within seven (7) days of such change.

An obligee who is a recipient of public aid shall send a copy of any notice filed pursuant to Section 93-11-103 to the department.

An obligor whose income is being withheld pursuant to Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119 shall notify the department and the clerk of the court of any new payor, within seven (7) days.

When the department is no longer authorized to receive payments for the obligee, it shall, within seven (7) days, notify the payor and the clerk of the court.

The department shall provide notice to the payor and the clerk of the court of any other support payment made, including, but not limited to, a set-off under federal and state law or partial payment of the delinquency.

The department shall maintain complete, accurate and clear records of all payments and their disbursements. Certified copies of payment records maintained by the department shall, without further proof, be admitted into evidence in any legal proceedings under Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119.

The department shall design suggested legal forms for proceeding under Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119 and shall make available to the courts such forms and informational materials which describe the procedures and remedies set forth herein for distribution to all parties in support actions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 8; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 93-11-116.
Order for withholding based upon support order from foreign jurisdiction; procedural requirements.

An obligee who seeks a wage withholding order based upon an order for support from a foreign jurisdiction, must comply with the provisions of Sections 93-12-1 through 93-12-19.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 474, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 93-11-117.
Penalties.

In cases in which a payor willfully fails to withhold or pay over income pursuant to a valid order for withholding, the following penalties shall apply:

The payor shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than:

Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); or

One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in an instance where the failure to comply is the result of collusion between the payor and the obligor; and

The court, upon due notice and hearing, shall enter judgment and direct the issuance of an execution for the total amount that the payor willfully failed to withhold or pay over.

In cases in which a payor discharges, disciplines, refuses to hire or otherwise penalizes an obligor as prohibited by subsection (9) of Section 93-11-111, the court, upon due notice and hearing, shall fine the payor in an amount not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

Any obligee, the department or obligor who willfully initiates a false proceeding under Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119 or who willfully fails to comply with the requirements of Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119 shall be punished as in cases of contempt of court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 9; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 141; Laws, 2007, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 334, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 93-11-118.
Fraudulent conveyance of assets by obligor.

Indicia of fraud which create a prima facie case that an obligor transferred income or property to avoid payment of child support to an obligee or department on behalf of an obligee shall be as stated in Section 15-3-3, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Remedies for such fraudulent conveyance shall include, but not be limited to, the setting aside of such conveyance.

Penalties for such fraudulent conveyance shall be a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 138, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 93-11-119.
Relation to other rights, remedies, duties, and penalties.

The rights, remedies, duties and penalties created by Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119 are in addition to and not in substitution for any other rights, remedies, duties and penalties created by any other law.

Nothing in Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119 shall be construed as invalidating any garnishment, attachment or assignment of wages or benefits instituted prior to July 1, 1985; provided, however, any such garnishment, attachment or assignment shall be subject to the priorities established under the provisions of subsection (3) of Section 93-11-111.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 518, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1985.